Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.260

Cooperation, agreements with other governmental agencies.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states and agencies of federal government in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1961 c 29 s 26.]